District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1968

Application of chapter; teacher-aide positions; initial assignment of school principals and periodic evaluation.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 525, ch. 569, title III, § 5
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1009, Pub. L. 85-838, § 1
Nov. 13, 1966, 80 Stat. 1598, Pub. L. 89-810, title II, § 202(4)
May 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 139, Pub. L. 90-319, § 2(8)
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 362, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 302(5)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1010, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, § 103(3)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3204(e), 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-133,§ 31(b), 27 DCR 4417
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78, § 11, 29 DCR 49

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1122.
1973 Ed., § 31-1522.